Mississippi, session 2026, SB2874.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Gold and Silver Commemorative Coin Act." (2)  The Treasurer of the State of Mississippi is hereby authorized to enter into a contractual agreement with a public or private minting company for the purposes of minting one-ounce gold state commemorative coins or one-ounce silver commemorative coins. (3)  (a)  Each commemorative coin shall be minted in accordance with standards similar to those used for American Gold Eagles and American Silver Eagles. (b)  The design of each coin shall include: (i)  The words "State of Mississippi"; (ii)  The phrase "In God We Trust"; (iii)  The year in which the coin is minted; (iv)  On one side, the Great Seal of the State of Mississippi; and (v)  On the reverse side, a design featuring the magnolia flower. (4)  (a)  No monetary value shall be stated on the coin. (b)  The coin shall not feature the image of any human being or group of human beings. (5)  The State Treasurer is authorized to take pre-orders and accept payment for these commemorative coins.  The coins shall be minted to the finest and highest quality standards. The Treasurer shall not sell the coins at below the cost of the metal plus any associated cost or fees.  Profits from the coins shall be  deposited into the State General Fund.  The Treasurer may keep twenty percent (20%) of the profits for administrative and other costs. (6)  The State Treasurer is authorized to oversee the minting process and to enter into the necessary agreements to produce and distribute the commemorative coins. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026, and shall stand repealed on June 30, 2026.